Hawaii statutes.
§664-11 Costs. The costs in each case
shall be borne by the petitioner or respondent, or shall be apportioned between
them, as equity and justice may require, in the judgment of the commissioner of
boundaries, subject to appeal as in this part provided. [L 1894-5, c 14, §13;
RL 1925, §563; RL 1935, §3670; RL 1945, §10211; RL 1955, §234-11; HRS §664-11]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next